zh-TW: 大蒜品種: 黑蒜; 象蒜; 硬骨蒜; 音樂蒜 (Music); 瓷蒜; 紫條紋蒜; 紅俄羅斯蒜; 羅康博蒜; 銀皮蒜; 軟骨蒜; 其他
lt-LT: Česnakų veislė: Juodasis; Dramblinis; Kietastiebis; „Music“; Porcelianinis; Violetiniais dryžiais („Purple Stripe“); „Red Russian“; Rokambolis; Sidabrinis („Silverskin“); Minkštastiebis; Kita
vi: Giống tỏi: Màu đen; Voi; Cổ cứng; Music; Porcelain; Sọc tím; Red Russian; Rocambole; Vỏ bạc; Cổ mềm; Khác
es: Variedad de ajo: Negro; Elefante; De cuello duro; Music; Porcelana; De rayas moradas; Ruso rojo; Rocambola; Piel de plata; De cuello blando; Otra
sv: Vitlökssort: Svart; Elefant; Hardneck; Music; Porslin; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Softneck; Övrigt
sk-SK: Odroda cesnaku: Čierny; Sloní; Paličiak; Music; Porcelain; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rokambol; Silverskin; Nepaličiak; Iný
da: Hvidløgssort: Sort; Elefant; Hardneck; Music; Porcelain; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Softneck; Andet
pt-PT: Variedade de alho: Preto; Elefante; Haste dura; Music; Porcelana; Riscas roxas; Vermelho russo; Rocambole; Pele prateada; Haste mole; Outra
nl: Knoflookras: Zwart; Olifantenknoflook; Hardneck; Music; Porselein; Purple stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Softneck; Overig
fi: Valkosipulilajike: Musta; Elefanttivalkosipuli; Kovakaulainen; Music; Posliini; Purple stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Hopeakuori; Pehmeäkaulainen; Muu
th: กระเทียมหลากหลายสายพันธุ์: สีดำ; โทนใหญ่; ก้านแข็ง; มิวสิค; พอร์ซเลน; เพอร์เพิลสไตรป์; เรดรัสเซียน; โรแคมโบล; ซิลเวอร์สกิน; ก้านอ่อน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 大蒜品种: 黑色; 象蒜 (Elephant); 硬脖蒜 (Hardneck); 音乐蒜 (Music); 瓷白蒜 (Porcelain); 紫条纹 (Purple Stripe); 俄罗斯红蒜 (Red Russian); 罗康博尔蒜 (Rocambole); 银皮蒜 (Silverskin); 软脖蒜 (Softneck); 其他
cs: Odrůda česneku: Černý; Sloní; Paličák; Music; Porcelánový; S fialovými pruhy; Ruský červený; Rokambol; Stříbřitý; Nepaličák; Ostatní
ro-RO: Soi de usturoi: Negru; Elefant; Hardneck; Music; Porcelain; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Softneck; Altele
ko: 마늘 품종: 검정색; 코끼리마늘; 하드넥; 뮤직; 포슬린; 퍼플 스트라이프; 레드 러시안; 로캄볼; 실버스킨; 소프트넥; 기타
it: Varietà di aglio: Nero; Elefante; A collo duro; Music; Porcelain; Purple stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; A collo morbido; Altro
pt-BR: Variedade de alho: Preto; Elefante; Haste dura; Music; Porcelana; Listrado roxo; Vermelho russo; Rocambole; Silverskin; Haste mole; Outro
pl: Odmiana czosnku: Czarny; Słoniowy (wielkogłówkowy); Twardołodygowy (hardneck); Music; Porcelain; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Miękkołodygowy (softneck); Inna
nb: Hvitløksvariant: Svart; Elefanthvitløk; Hardneck; Music; Porselen; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Softneck; Annet
en: Garlic variety: Black; Elephant; Hardneck; Music; Porcelain; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Softneck; Other
el: Ποικιλία σκόρδου: Μαύρο; Ελέφαντας; Σκληρόλαιμο (Hardneck); Music; Porcelain; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Μαλακόλαιμο (Softneck); Άλλο
de: Knoblauchsorten: Schwarz; Elefantenknoblauch; Hardneck; Music; Porzellan; Purple Stripe; Red Russian; Rocambole; Silverskin; Softneck; Sonstige
hu: Fokhagymafajta: Fekete; Elefánt; Keményszárú; Music; Porcelán; Lila csíkos; Vörös orosz; Rocambole; Ezüsthéjú; Lágyszárú; Egyéb
ru: Сорт чеснока: Черный; Слоновий; Стрелкующийся; Мьюзик; Фарфоровый; Фиолетовый полосатый; Красный русский; Рокамболь; Серебристый; Нестрелкующийся; Другое
ja: ニンニクの種類: 黒; エレファント; ハードネック; ミュージック; ポーセリン; パープルストライプ; レッドロシアン; ロカンボール; シルバースキン; ソフトネック; その他
fr: Variété d’ail: Noir; Éléphant; À col dur; Music; Porcelaine; À rayures violettes; Rouge de Russie; Rocambole; À peau argentée; À col tendre; Autre
hr-HR: Sorta češnjaka: Crni; Slonovski; Tvrdi vrat; Music; Porculanski; Ljubičasti prugasti; Crveni ruski; Rocambole; Srebrni; Meki vrat; Ostalo
bg-BG: Сорт чесън: Черен; Слонски чесън; С твърдо стъбло; Музика; Порцелан; Лилава лента (Purple Stripe); Червен руски; Рокамбол; Сребърна люспа; С меко стъбло; Друго
tr: Sarımsak çeşidi: Siyah; Fil; Sert boyunlu; Music; Porselen; Mor çizgili; Kırmızı Rus; Rocambole; Gümüş kabuklu; Yumuşak boyunlu; Diğer
sl-SI: Sorta česna: Črn; Slonov; S trdim steblom; Music; Porcelanasti; Z vijoličastimi črtami; Red Russian; Rokambol; Srebrni; Z mehkim steblom; Drugo